Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 3 Improvement and Grading by Towns

24-3-1.
Power to mark out, widen or relocate municipal roads.

Town councils may mark out, relay, widen, straighten, or change the location of the whole of or any part of any municipal road, whether laid out by the state or otherwise, except the highways on both sides of the Woonasquatucket River directed to be laid out by chapter 362 of the Public Laws, passed at the January session of the general assembly in the year 1861; and thereupon like proceedings shall be had in all respects, so far as the same are applicable, including appeals, as are provided in this chapter in case of taking land and ascertaining damages to the owners of lands taken in laying out or in case of the abandonment of highways.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 28; P.L. 1903, ch. 1106, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-1

; P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 1.

24-3-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 29; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-2

; Repealed by P.L. 1988, ch. 633, § 2, effective July 1, 1988.

24-3-3.
Hearing on enlargement or relocation in towns — Commissioners of estimate and assessment.

Whenever the town council of any town named in §

24-3-17

, shall adjudge it to be necessary to lay out, enlarge, straighten, improve, or alter any street or highway, or any part thereof, in the town, the council may cause the same to be done in the manner following: Whenever any lands shall be required for the purpose aforesaid, and the town council shall be of the opinion that any estates will be specially benefited thereby, the council shall, after notice to all persons interested, which notice shall specify the time and place of the meetings of the council and the nature and extent of the intended improvement, and after hearing all persons who desire to be heard in the matter, appoint not less than three (3) nor more than five (5) discreet and disinterested persons as commissioners of estimate and assessment, who may be residents and taxpayers in the town; and the council may at the same time determine that a portion of the damage occasioned by taking any real estate for the aforesaid purpose, not exceeding three-fourths (3/4) thereof, shall be assessed upon the owners of estates which the commissioners shall find will be specially benefited by making the proposed improvement, whether any part of the estates are taken for the improvement or not; provided, that the owners shall not be assessed in any case beyond the amount that the commissioners shall consider their estates to be specially benefited thereby. The commissioners, before entering upon the duties of their office, shall be severally engaged to the faithful discharge of the trust and duties required of them.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 32; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-3

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 54.

24-3-4.
Assessment of benefits and damages in cities.

Whenever the city council of any city shall adjudge it to be necessary to lay out, enlarge, straighten, improve or alter any street or highway, or any part thereof, in the city, and any lands shall be required for the purpose aforesaid, and the city council shall be of the opinion that any estates will be specially benefited thereby, and the city council shall determine what portion of the damage occasioned by taking any real estate for the aforesaid purpose, not exceeding three-fourths (3/4) thereof, shall be assessed upon the owners of estates which the commissioners appointed under this chapter shall find to be specially benefited by making the proposed improvement, whether any part of the estates are taken for the improvement or not (provided, that the owners shall not be assessed in any case beyond the amount that the commissioners shall consider their estates to be specially benefited thereby), the city council of the city shall thereupon proceed in the same manner and with the same powers and authority as is given to town councils in §

24-3-3

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 33; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-4

.

24-3-5.
Commissioners’ estimate and report.

The commissioners shall cause a survey and plat of the proposed alteration to be made; and shall cause notice to be given to all persons interested in the lands to be taken or in the improvement to be made, and to all persons who are owners of lands which, in the opinion of the commissioners, will be benefited by the proposed alterations, of the time and place of making an estimate of the value of the property so required to be taken, and of the special benefits to be conferred by making the alterations; and at the time and place appointed in the notice, the commissioners shall proceed to make a just estimate of the amount of the damage occasioned to the respective owners, lessees, parties, or persons entitled to or interested in the lands taken for the alteration, and also a just estimate of the value of the special benefits, if any, caused thereby, to the several owners of lands not required for the proposed improvements, but which will, in the opinion of the commissioners, be benefited thereby; and the commissioners shall report thereon to the town council or city council without unnecessary delay. The commissioners shall set forth in the report the names of the owners of, and persons in any way interested in, any of the land taken for the proposed improvement, so far as the names can be ascertained, and a description or designation of the several parcels thereof, with the damage and benefit to each respectively. The commissioners shall further apportion and assess a portion of the damage and cost of improvements as the town or city council may have directed, ascertained as provided, upon the owners of the estate so specially benefited, in proportion to the special benefits conferred; provided, that the amount of the assessment shall not exceed the amount of the special benefits, ascertained as provided.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 34; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-5

.

24-3-6.
Filing and notice of report.

The town council or city council shall, within fourteen (14) days after the making of a report, cause personal notice to be served upon all persons named in the report, residing in the state, and shall also cause a copy of the notice to be published, as provided in §

24-3-7

, to the effect that the report has been filed in the clerk’s office, and that any person aggrieved by the report must file, with the clerk of the superior court for the county where the town or city is situated, a notice in writing of his or her intention to claim a jury trial as provided in §

24-3-8

; and he or she shall also cause a copy of the report to be filed with the clerk of the superior court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 35; C.P.A. 1905, § 1216; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-6

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 54.

24-3-7.
Publication and posting of notices.

The notice required by §§

24-3-3

—

24-3-6

in addition to the personal notice, shall be given by publishing the notice once a week for two (2) succeeding weeks in at least two (2) newspapers such as the town council or city council may order; and they shall also cause three (3) or more copies of the notice to be posted in conspicuous public places on or near the place where the proposed improvements are to be made; provided, however, that the first publication of the notice required by §

24-3-6

shall be made within fourteen (14) days after the filing of the report.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 43; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 46; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 46; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 46; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-7

.

24-3-8.
Jury trial on report.

Every person aggrieved by the report of the commissioners shall, within sixty (60) days after the first publication of the notice of the filing of the report named in §

24-3-6

, file with the clerk of the superior court a notice in writing of his or her intention to claim a jury trial; and in case the aggrieved person fails to file such notice, he or she shall not be entitled to a jury trial. Any person filing a notice may have a trial by jury before the superior court, to determine the amount of damage and benefit to him or her to be apportioned, upon issues to be for that purpose framed under the direction of the court; and if the person applying for a jury trial shall fail to obtain an increase of damages, or a diminution of the amount of benefit, assessed by the commissioners, the person shall pay all costs arising after the application for a jury and the court shall enter judgment and issue execution therefor; and in other cases the costs shall be paid by the town or city.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 36; C.P.A. 1905, § 1216; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 39; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 39; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-8

.

24-3-9.
Election by council to make or discontinue improvements.

The town or city council shall, within one hundred twenty (120) days after the first publication of notice required by §

24-3-8

, elect whether or not they will make improvements, and the town or city council may, at any time before election, discontinue all further proceedings relative thereto, but the town or city, upon the discontinuance, shall be liable for all costs, fees and expenses which shall have accrued; and the court may enter judgment and issue execution therefor as to the costs accrued on an appeal.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 37; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-9

.

24-3-10.
Taking of possession by town — Removal of crops and improvements.

The town or city, after electing by the town or city council to make the improvements as provided in §

24-3-9

, shall become seized of all the land in the report mentioned that shall be required for making the improvements, in trust for use as a public highway. And the town or city may, by the person and at such time as the town council or city council shall order, take possession of the land or any part thereof, without any process of law, and remove all buildings and other impediments as the town council or city council shall order and direct; provided, that the owner of the land shall have the right, within thirty (30) days after the town or city council shall have elected to make the improvements, or within such further time as the town council or city council may grant, to remove all crops, trees, buildings or other improvements thereon, for his or her own use and benefit.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 38; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 41; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 41; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 41; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-10

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 55.

24-3-11.
Confirmation of reports.

The town council or city council, after the election to make improvements, as provided in §

24-3-9

, shall confirm the report of the commissioners to all persons who have not given notice of their intention to claim a jury trial as provided in §

24-3-8

, and shall finally confirm the report, as to those persons who shall have claimed a trial by jury, in accordance with the verdicts rendered, or in accordance with such other disposition as shall have been made of the claims for a jury trial; and the report, so confirmed, shall be final and conclusive upon the parties.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 39; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 42; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 42; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 42; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-11

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 55.

24-3-12.
Termination of leases and contracts on land taken.

Whenever the whole of any lot or parcel of land, or any building under lease or other contract, shall be taken as provided in §

24-3-10

, for any of the purposes as provided in this chapter, upon the election of the town or city council, as provided in §

24-3-9

, to make improvements, the lease or contract shall immediately cease and determine and be absolutely discharged. In case only part of any parcel of real estate so under lease or other contract shall be taken, all contracts and engagements respecting the parcel shall, from the time of the election, cease and determine, and be absolutely discharged as to the part so taken, but shall remain valid as to the residue, and the rents, considerations, and payments, reserved or payable and to be paid for or in respect of the time, shall be apportioned so that the just proportional part thereof shall be demanded or paid or recoverable for or in respect of the rents, considerations, and payments.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 40; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 43; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 43; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 43; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-12

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 55.

24-3-13.
Payment of damages awarded — Action against town.

The town or city shall, within four (4) months after the confirmation of the report of the commissioners, pay to the person entitled thereto the amount of damage finally awarded upon the report. In the case of a default of the payment, the person entitled to the payment, after application to the town or city council for payment thereof, may sue the town or city for and recover the payment, with interest. In the suit it shall be sufficient to declare generally for so much money due the plaintiff, by virtue of this chapter, for premises taken for the purpose herein mentioned; and the plaintiff may give any special matter in evidence under a general declaration, with proof of the right of the plaintiff to the sum demanded.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 41; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 44; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 44; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 44; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-13

.

24-3-14.
Collection of assessments for benefits — Lien.

The amount of benefit apportioned and assessed to the owners of real estate by the commissioners in their report, confirmed as aforesaid, and required by the report to be paid by the respective owners, shall be added to the taxes assessed against the real estate and the owners thereof by the assessors of taxes at the next or any subsequent annual assessment of taxes after the confirmation of the report, and shall be and remain a lien upon the real estates from and after the confirmation until it is paid, and shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as the other taxes assessed against the real estate and the owners thereof; except in cases where the estates are owned by nonresidents in the state, or minors, in which case one year in addition shall be allowed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 42; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 45; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 45; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 45; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-14

.

24-3-15.
Compensation and expenses of commissioners.

The commissioners shall be entitled to receive for their services a reasonable compensation, to be allowed by the town council or city council; and all sums reasonably expended for maps, plats, and clerk hire and other necessary expenses, shall be paid by the town.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 44; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 47; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 47; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 47; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-15

.

24-3-16.
Declaration of opening of highway.

Whenever all buildings and impediments have been removed, by order of the town council or city council, from the street or portion thereof taken, and the street shall be open for public use, the town council or city council shall declare the opening, and it shall be a public highway.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 45; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 48; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 48; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 48; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-16

.

24-3-17.
Cities and towns affected.

Sections

24-3-3

—

24-3-16

shall apply only to the cities of Newport, Pawtucket, Woonsocket, Central Falls, Cranston, Warwick, and the towns of Lincoln, Johnston, Warren, Bristol, Middletown, East Greenwich, East Providence, New Shoreham, Little Compton, West Warwick, Cumberland, Barrington, Jamestown, North Providence, Westerly, South Kingstown, Narragansett, and Glocester.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 71, § 46; P.L. 1897, ch. 503, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 82, § 49; G.L. 1923, ch. 95, § 49; G.L. 1938, ch. 72, § 49; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-17

; P.L. 1990, ch. 296, § 1.

24-3-18.
Commissioners to define grade.

Whenever in any town any person or persons owning land abutting on any platted street or way, which is not a public highway, the plat of which is recorded in the office of the clerk of the town in which the land is situated, shall petition the town council of the town to cause the grade of any street or way to be defined, the town council shall appoint three (3) discreet and disinterested persons, residents and taxpayers of the town, as commissioners to define the grade of the street or way; which commissioners, before entering upon the duties of their office, shall be engaged to the faithful discharge of the trust.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 37; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 36; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-18

.

24-3-19.
Notice of report on definition of grade.

The town council thereupon shall cause such notice as the council may deem best to be given to all the owners of land abutting on the street or way, to appear before the council at the time named in the notice, if they shall see fit, and be heard for or against receiving the report.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 38; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 37; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-19

.

24-3-20.
Council action on commissioners’ report — Recording.

The town council shall, after hearing the persons appearing to be heard, proceed to reject, confirm, or recommit the report of the commissioners in whole or in part, to the same or new commissioners, to be appointed by the town council for that purpose, who shall revise the report and make a return thereof without delay to the town council; whereupon the town council shall reject or confirm, or again recommit the report in the manner as provided in §

24-3-11

, as right and justice shall require. And if the report shall be confirmed, the town council shall cause the report, together with the profile plat accompanying the report, to be recorded.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 39; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-20

.

24-3-21.
Effect of definition of grade.

Whenever any street or way shall be received and established as a public highway, the defined grade shall be the established grade of the street or highway; but no action relating to the grade of any street or highway shall be so construed as to be a receiving or establishing of any street or way as a public highway.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 40; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 39; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 39; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-21

.

24-3-22.
Compensation and expenses of commissioners — Collection from petitioners.

The commissioners shall be entitled to a reasonable compensation for their services, and for all sums of money expended for the plat and other necessary disbursements, to be allowed by the town council, whether the report is rejected, confirmed, or recommitted, to be paid by the petitioners, the amount of which shall be equally apportioned and assessed to the petitioners by the assessors of taxes; and unless paid forthwith by the petitioners, shall be added to the taxes assessed against the real estate abutting on the platted street or way belonging to the petitioners and the petitioners owning the property at the next annual assessment of taxes; and shall be and remain a lien upon the real estate until it is paid, and shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as the other taxes assessed against the petitioners, except in cases where the petitioners are nonresidents of this state or of the United States, in which cases one year in addition shall be allowed for the payment of the assessment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 41; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 41; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-22

.

24-3-23.
Grading or change of grade — Notice and hearing.

Town councils may order highways or parts of highways to be graded within their respective towns, and whenever a grade for any highway shall be established the grade shall not be changed without the consent of the town council of the town in which it is located, nor without notice to the proprietors of lands abutting on the highway, which notice, if the proprietor resides within this state, shall be served five (5) days before the passing of an order for the grade or change of grade, and if any of the proprietors reside without the state, notice shall be served upon them as provided by §

24-1-6

. At the time and place named in the notice, the town council shall proceed to hear the parties, and to pass an order in reference to the grade, or change of grade, as they may think proper.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 28; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-23

.

24-3-24.
Establishment and curbing of sidewalks.

Whenever any highway is graded, or the grade thereof is changed, the town council may order sidewalks therein to be established, and the sidewalks to be curbed, upon like notice to the abutting proprietors of lands as provided in §

24-3-23

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 29; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-24

.

24-3-25.
Liability for cost of curbs.

Whenever any highway shall be graded, and sidewalks established therein, and the sidewalks shall be ordered to be curbed as provided in §

24-3-24

, the owners of land abutting on the sidewalks shall pay the cost of the curbstones to be set against their respective lands.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 30; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-25

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 54.

24-3-26.
Collection of curb costs.

The costs of the curbstones shall be ascertained by the surveyor of highways, and be by the surveyor submitted to and be approved by the town council, and then the surveyor of highways shall demand the costs of the abutting owner, and if the owner shall neglect or refuse to pay the costs, the surveyor of highways shall certify the costs so ascertained and approved, to the assessors of taxes for the town, and the assessors shall include the costs of the curbstones, which sum shall be included in the next assessment of taxes for the town against the land or the owner thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 31; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 31; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-26

.

24-3-27.
Settlement or appraisal of damages from change of grade.

Whenever any abutting owner shall deem himself or herself to be injured by any change in the grade of a highway, and the owner shall make a claim for compensation for the injury to the town council within forty (40) days after the change of grade shall have been completed, the town council shall appoint three (3) suitable and indifferent persons, not interested in the lands bordering on the highway the grade of which has been changed, who shall be engaged to the faithful discharge of their duties, and who shall go upon the highway when the grade thereof has been changed, and examine the highway, and the estate alleged to have been injured by changing the grade of the highway, and endeavor to agree with the owner of the estate as to the amount of damage sustained by the owner by means of the change of grade, and if they agree with the owner, they shall reduce the agreement to writing and report the agreement to the town council, which report shall be binding upon the owner and upon the town; but if they fail to agree with the owner as to the damage, they shall report the failure to the town council, whereupon the council, after notice to the owner and offering him or her an opportunity to be heard, shall proceed to appraise the damage done to the owner by means of the change of grade.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 32; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 31; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-27

.

24-3-28.
Appeal of appraisals and assessments.

Every person having been notified as provided in §

24-3-23

, and having objected in writing to the action of the town council, on or before the day specified in the notice, who shall be aggrieved by any appraisal of damages made by any town council under the provisions of §

24-3-27

, or who shall be aggrieved by the assessment of any curbstone tax ordered as is provided in §

24-3-25

, may appeal therefrom according to the provisions of law with reference to appeals from town councils.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 33; C.P.A. 1905, § 1105; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 32; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-28

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 54.

24-3-29.
Judgment on appeal.

If the person appealing from any appraisal of damages made by the town council shall fail to have the damages increased on the appeal, the person shall pay the costs, and shall have judgment for the amount of damages awarded him or her, but if the damages are increased on the appeal, then the person shall have judgment for the damages and costs awarded to him or her, and execution may issue therefor; and every person appealing from any assessment of taxes for curbstones who shall fail to have the taxes reduced on appeal shall be adjudged to pay the costs of suit, and the collector of taxes may proceed to collect the taxes as if the appeal had not been taken, but if the appellant shall succeed in having the tax reduced, the appellant shall recover the costs, and the collector of taxes shall collect from the appellant only so much of the tax as shall have been found on appeal to be due from the appellant.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 34; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 33; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-29

.

24-3-30.
Payment of damages — Action for recovery.

The town in which the change of grade of a street or highway shall be made shall be liable to any abutting proprietor whose estate therein shall be injured thereby, and the damages therefor, whether agreed on, or appraised, by the town council or by the court, shall be paid by the town treasurer of the town, against whom, if he or she refuse or neglect to pay the damages, an action may be had and maintained for the money by the person to whom the damages is due and payable.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 35; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 34; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-30

.

24-3-31.
Islands exempt from provisions.

Hope, Patience, and Hog Islands are exempted from the operation of §§

24-3-23

—

24-3-30

and §§

24-5-1

—

24-5-27

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 72, § 36; G.L. 1909, ch. 83, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 96, § 35; G.L. 1938, ch. 73, § 35; G.L. 1956, §

24-3-31

.